src/fst/test/gt-norm-yamls/N-A-nitana_gt-norm.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:
  
  Noun - nitána - ok : # -m animate noun, my daughter AEW NA1
     nitana+NAD+Px1Sg+Sg: nitána
     nitana+NAD+Px1Sg+Pl: nitániksi
     nitana+NAD+Px1Sg+Obv: nitáni
     nitana+NAD+Px1Sg+Non: nitáni
     
     nitana+NAD+Px1Pl+Sg: nitánnaana
     nitana+NAD+Px1Pl+Pl: nitánnaaniksi
     nitana+NAD+Px1Pl+Obv: nitánnaani
     nitana+NAD+Px1Pl+Non: nitánnaani

     nitana+NAD+Px21Pl+Sg: kitánnoona
     nitana+NAD+Px21Pl+Pl: kitánnooniksi
     nitana+NAD+Px21Pl+Obv: kitánnooni
     nitana+NAD+Px21Pl+Non: kitánnooni

     nitana+NAD+Px2Sg+Sg: kitána
     nitana+NAD+Px2Sg+Pl: kitániksi
     nitana+NAD+Px2Sg+Obv: kitáni
     nitana+NAD+Px2Sg+Non: kitáni

     nitana+NAD+Px2Pl+Sg: kitánoaawa
     nitana+NAD+Px2Pl+Pl: kitánoaawaiksi
     nitana+NAD+Px2Pl+Obv: kitánoaawayi
     nitana+NAD+Px2Pl+Non: kitánoaawai

     nitana+NAD+Px3Sg+Pl: otániksi
     nitana+NAD+Px3Sg+Obv: otáni
     nitana+NAD+Px3Sg+Non: otáni

     nitana+NAD+Px3Pl+Pl: otánoaawaiksi
     nitana+NAD+Px3Pl+Obv: otánoaawayi
     nitana+NAD+Px3Pl+Non: otánoaawai

    
